Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Void Marriages

402.010.
Degree of relationship that will bar marriage.

No marriage shall be contracted between persons who are nearer of kin to each other by consanguinity, whether of the whole or half-blood, than second cousins.

Marriages prohibited by subsection (1) of this section are incestuous and void.

History.

2096: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 124.

402.020.
Other prohibited marriages.

Marriage is prohibited and void:

With a person who has been adjudged mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Where there is a husband or wife living, from whom the person marrying has not been divorced;

When not solemnized or contracted in the presence of an authorized person or society;

Between members of the same sex;

Between more than two (2) persons; and

Except as provided in KRS

402.210

, with a person who at the time of marriage is under eighteen (18) years of age.

Subsection (1)(f) of this section shall not apply to a lawful marriage entered into in the Commonwealth of Kentucky prior to July 14, 2018, or to a lawful marriage in another state or country prior to the parties’ residence in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

HISTORY:

2097: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 8, § 1; 1966, ch. 72; 1968, ch. 200, § 10; 1974, ch. 49, § 6; 1974, ch. 386, § 90; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 399, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 92, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 113, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 212, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 122, § 1, effective March 26, 1998; 1998, ch. 258, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was amended by § 124 of Acts 1980, ch. 396, which would have taken effect July 1, 1982; however, Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 146, effective July 1, 1982, repealed Acts 1980, ch. 396.

On June 26, 2015, the United States Supreme Court in Obergefell v. Hodges, 192 L. Ed. 2d 609, held that the Fourteenth Amendment requires a State to license a marriage between two people of the same sex and to recognize a marriage between two people of the same sex when their marriage was lawfully licensed and performed out-of-State.

402.030.
Courts may declare certain marriages void.

Courts having general jurisdiction may declare void any marriage obtained by force or fraud, or, provided that the petition is brought by a party who was under the age of majority as defined by KRS

2.015

at the time of marriage, a marriage obtained by duress.

At the instance of any next friend, courts having general jurisdiction may declare any marriage void where the person was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the marriage, and the marriage was without the consent required by KRS

402.210

.

HISTORY:

2100: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 8, § 2; 1974, ch. 386, § 91; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 400, effective January 2, 1978; 1988, ch. 212, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 122, § 2, effective March 26, 1998; 1998, ch. 258, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 36, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.